Tennessee statutes. Title 12 Public Property, Printing And Contracts
Part 1

General Provisions

12-4-101. Personal interest of officers prohibited.

It is unlawful for any officer, committee member, director, or other person whose duty it is to vote for, let out, overlook, or in any manner to superintend any work or any contract in which any municipal corporation, county, state, development district, utility district, human resource agency, or other political subdivision created by statute shall or may be interested, to be directly interested in any such contract. “Directly interested” means any contract with the official personally or with any business in which the official is the sole proprietor, a partner, or the person having the controlling interest. “Controlling interest” includes the individual with the ownership or control of the largest number of outstanding shares owned by any single individual or corporation. This subdivision (a)(1) shall not be construed to prohibit any officer, committee person, director, or any person, other than a member of a local governing body of a county or municipality, from voting on the budget, appropriation resolution, or tax rate resolution, or amendments thereto, unless the vote is on a specific amendment to the budget or a specific appropriation or resolution in which such person is directly interested.

Subdivision (a)(1) shall also apply to a member of the board of directors of any not-for-profit corporation authorized by the laws of Tennessee to act for the benefit or on behalf of any one (1) or more counties, cities, towns and local governments pursuant to title 7, chapter 54 or 58.

Subdivision (a)(2)(A) shall not apply to any county with a metropolitan form of government and having a population of four hundred thousand (400,000) or more, according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

It is unlawful for any officer, committee member, director, or other person whose duty it is to vote for, let out, overlook, or in any manner to superintend any work or any contract in which any municipal corporation, county, state, development district, utility district, human resource agency, or other political subdivision created by statute shall or may be interested, to be indirectly interested in any such contract unless the officer publicly acknowledges such officer's interest. “Indirectly interested” means any contract in which the officer is interested but not directly so, but includes contracts where the officer is directly interested but is the sole supplier of goods or services in a municipality or county.

This section shall apply to a member of the board of directors or officer of any nonprofit corporation required under § 8-44-102 to conduct all meetings of its governing body as open meetings.

Acts 1869-1870, ch. 92, § 1; Shan., § 1133; Code 1932, § 1874; Acts 1977, ch. 102, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 12-401; Acts 1983, ch. 388, §§ 4, 6; 1984, ch. 831, § 1; 1986, ch. 765, §§ 1-3; 1988, ch. 908, §§ 4, 5; 1989, ch. 366, §§ 1-3; 1998, ch. 774, § 1; 2006, ch. 923, § 4; 2013, ch. 403, § 71; 2016, ch. 1072, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 12, ch. 3 and ch. 4, part 1 were recodified by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 8-70, effective July 1, 2013. The following table of disposition lists the sections in former ch. 3 and ch. 4, part 1, indicating the location of the same or similar provisions, if any.

This section shall not apply in counties having the following populations, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, nor to municipalities located within such counties:

Many of the casenotes listed below are from cases decided prior to the 1986 amendment to this section adding subsection (c). Although the addition of this subsection may affect the continued validity of some of the notes, the notes have been set out for historical reference purposes.

For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.

Cross-References. Certification of funds available, §9-4-5113.

Distributing and posting solicitations and responses electronically, §12-3-1004.

Employment of licensed architects and engineers, §62-2-302.

Improvements constructed with convict labor, §41-22-102.

Public buildings, accessibility for physically handicapped, title 68, ch. 120, part 2.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 7 Tenn. Juris., Contracts, §§ 11, 47, 117; 21 Tenn. Juris., Public Officers, § 4.

Law Reviews.

Local Government Law — 1961 Tennessee Survey (Eugene Puett), 14 Vand. L. Rev. 1335.

Attorney General Opinions. Applicability, OAG 88-37, 1988 Tenn. AG LEXIS 37 (2/23/88).

Applicability to lobbyists, OAG 90-73, 1990 Tenn. AG LEXIS 73 (7/27/90).

Direct and indirect conflicts of interest, OAG 93-73, 1993 Tenn. AG LEXIS 73 (12/28/93).

Utility district contract with manager, OAG 94-104, 1994 Tenn. AG LEXIS 105 (9/9/94).

County commissioners adopting County Financial Management System of 1981, OAG 97-166, 1997 Tenn. AG LEXIS 183 (12/16/97).

Dual membership on city council and hospital board, OAG 98-004, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 4 (1/5/98).

County commissioner's association with nonprofit corporation seeking county ambulance contract, OAG 98-0109 (6/11/98).

County or school board employee serving on county legislative body, OAG 98-0112, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 112 (6/16/98).

Utility board employee serving as mayor or city council member, OAG 98-0130, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 129 (7/27/98).

Reimbursement for state judge's rental and other expenses of office owned by judge, OAG 98-162, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 162 (8/24/98); OAG 98-0163, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 163 (8/24/98).

Conflicts of interest involving downtown development entities and directors, OAG 99-043, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 56 (2/25/99).

Conflict of interest of volunteers in district attorney general's office, OAG 99-085, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 85 (4/6/99).

Volunteer created no conflict of interest in district attorney general's office, OAG 99-122, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 131 (5/28/99).

Constable serving as deputy sheriff, OAG 99-160, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 148 (8/19/99).

Contract funded by federal grant, conflict of interest, OAG 99-185, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 213 (9/17/99).

School board member, conflict of interest, OAG 99-209, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 189 (10/20/99).

Emergency dispatchers — conflicts of interest, OAG 99-219, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 179 (11/4/99).

Right to work law, union rules and fines, conflicts of interest, remedies, OAG 99-231, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 225 (12/15/99).

General sessions judge serving as Trenton City judge, OAG 00-043, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 43 (3/13/00).

Legislator as state employee, OAG 00-064, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 65 (4/3/00).

An attorney who works for the Tennessee department of correction may engage in the practice of law outside the department of correction, OAG 00-111, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 113(6/20/00).

Assuming a construction manager is not a public official or officer, there is no conflict of interest under T.C.A. §12-4-101(a)(1) for a construction manager who performs services for a county board of education to also bid on, contract to perform, and/or be awarded construction work on school building projects the individual was hired to supervise, OAG 00-117, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 119 (7/5/00).

An assistant district attorney general who has a financial interest in a probation agency, or would otherwise derive personal benefit from the business of the agency, should not participate in prosecutions involving defendants who are seeking probation, have been placed on probation, or where probation is being revoked, OAG 00-137, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 138 (8/24/00).

A county commissioner who was a bookkeeper for the county board of education did not have a conflict of interest that required abstention from a vote regarding the adoption of the county financial management system of 1981, OAG 00-180, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 183 (11/22/00).

T.C.A. §12-4-101 did not prohibit a county and the county school board from purchasing items from a business owned by an individual whose spouse was employed by the county school board as a teacher as the teacher presumably was not part of the decision-making process regarding the purchases, OAG 00-181, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 184 (11/22/00).

A county commissioner can be an employee of the county highway commission, so long as the commissioner observes the voting rules set out in T.C.A. §12-4-101(c), OAG 01-084, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 75 (5/23/01).

Although both the sheriff and a constable within a county were required to serve civil process, an individual holding both offices would not violate T.C.A. §12-4-101(a) for that reason alone, as it was unlikely that a court would conclude that the duty of a sheriff or a constable to serve civil process was “work” or a “contract” within the meaning of the statute and as neither sheriff nor a constable controls the other's duty to serve civil process, OAG 02-012, 2002 Tenn. AG LEXIS 13 (1/18/02).

Assuming the school board has no authority to vote for, let out, overlook, or superintend a contract with the county sheriff's department for counseling services, T.C.A. §12-4-101(a) does not prohibit a member of the school board from entering into such a contract, OAG 02-128, 2002 Tenn. AG LEXIS 133 (11/25/02).

Except for the narrow exception of a county commissioner in T.C.A. §12-4-101(c)(1), a violation of the general conflict of interest statute or T.C.A. §5-21-121(a) has no effect on the validity of an official's vote, OAG 02-128, 2002 Tenn. AG LEXIS 133 (11/25/02).

The exclusion of human resource agencies from the potential conflict of interest disclosure of a grant proposal for child care broker services does not violate the equal protection provisions of the United States or Tennessee constitutions, OAG 03-013, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 9 (1/30/03).

Members of a county board of commissioners serving on the board of directors of a non-profit corporation are not prohibited from voting on a contract to sell county property to the corporation, even if the sale is for less than fair market value, OAG 03-120, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 138 (9/24/03).

If members of a county board of commissioners serving on the board of directors of a non-profit corporation the commissioners have a pecuniary interest in the sale of county assets to the corporation, they must disclose that interest, OAG 03-120, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 138 (9/24/03).

Legislator's conflict of interest: lottery advertising, OAG 04-002, 2004 Tenn. AG LEXIS 2 (1/06/04).

Sale of land owned by a county commissioner to the county highway department, which will not purchase such land without county commission approval, provided he abstains from voting on the transaction and states his interest, is prohibited under T.C.A. §12-4-101(a)(1), but violation of the statute is not a crime, OAG 04-016, 2004 Tenn. AG LEXIS 16 (2/05/04).

T.C.A. §12-4-101(a)(1) prohibits a county commissioner from voting on or supervising a contract for the sale of his or her land, OAG 04-016, 2004 Tenn. AG LEXIS 16 (2/05/04).

Under T.C.A. §12-4-102, an officer who enters into a contract in violation of this section must forfeit compensation under the contract; a suit to enforce this provision is a quo warranto action that ordinarily must be brought by the district attorney general, OAG 04-016, 2004 Tenn. AG LEXIS 16 (2/05/04).

An officer who is directly interested in a contract in violation of T.C.A. §12-4-101(a)(1) is to be dismissed from office and is ineligible to serve in the same or similar position for ten years, OAG 04-016, 2004 Tenn. AG LEXIS 16 (2/05/04).

Under subsection (b) of this section, a member of the county financial management committee must disclose his or her indirect interest when voting on contracts that affect his or her spouse's employment contract with the county, especially such matters as the spouse's compensation, but the statute does not require abstention, OAG 05-017, 2005 Tenn. AG LEXIS 17 (2/03/05).

Legislator as president of the Tennessee Professional Fire Fighters Association, OAG 05-126, 2005 Tenn. AG LEXIS 128 (8/22/05).

Direct appropriation grant to corporation for which legislator is president, OAG 05-169, 2005 Tenn. AG LEXIS 171 (11/3/05).

Applicability of statutes pertaining to public purchasing and public contracting, and governing general contractors, to housing authorities established by municipalities or counties pursuant to T.C.A. §§13-20-101 et seq., OAG 05-170, 2005 Tenn. AG LEXIS 172 (11/21/05).

It does not present any conflict of interest for an instructor at the fire service and codes academy to serve on the commission on fire fighting personnel standards commission, OAG 06-114, 2006 Tenn. AG LEXIS 149 (7/19/06).

T.C.A. §12-4-101(a)(1) would not prohibit an incumbent commissioner from voting for herself in a decision under T.C.A. §2-8-111, OAG 06-132, 2006 Tenn. AG LEXIS 149 (8/16/06).

Conflicts of interest involving state and county election commissions, OAG 06-159, 2006 Tenn. AG LEXIS 179 (10/9/06).

Service on the board of the Tellico Reservoir Development Agency by a state representative, OAG 07-036, 2007 Tenn. AG LEXIS 38 (3/26/17).

Company that employs a state legislator may seek to enter into contracts with the state, OAG 08-192, 2008 Tenn. AG LEXIS 237 (12/29/08).

State legislator contracting with non-profit state grant recipient: use of state grant funds. OAG 10-02, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 2 (1/14/10).

Citizen school board member conflicts of interest. OAG 10-46, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 46 (4/12/10).

Four Lake Regional Industrial Development Authority: appointing executive director. OAG 10-55, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 55 (4/23/10).

Conflict of interest of county commissioner also employed or formerly employed by a county department. OAG 11-50, 2011 Tenn. AG LEXIS 52 (6/16/11).

Conflict of Interest -- Member of County Board of Education. OAG 12-04, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 108 (11/9/12).

Conflicts of interest: joint economic and community development boards. OAG 12-09, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 10 (1/20/12).

Same individual serving as county finance director and member of school board. OAG 12-19, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 19 (2/22/12).

Human resource agency board member conflict of interest. OAG 12-37, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 37 (3/19/12).

County commission meetings: quorum and majority vote requirements; requirements as to particular type of space or facility for meetings. OAG 12-109, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 113 (12/14/12).

Algood city administrator serving as Algood city police chief. OAG 13-63, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 64 (8/9/13).

County commissioner voting on county school system budget. OAG 13-89, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 90 (11/12/13).

Teacher elected to serve on local school board by which teacher is employed may not retain employment as a teacher. OAG 14-53, 2014 Tenn. AG Lexis 55 (5/1/14)

The “sole supplier” exception in T.C.A. §12-4-101(b) applies only when a county official is the sole supplier located in the county. Under the general rule established by Tennessee courts, the doctrine of quantum meruit does not apply if an official contracts with the county in violation of T.C.A. §12-4-101. OAG 16-19, 2016 Tenn. AG LEXIS 20 (5/18/2016).

A member of the Underground Storage Tanks and Solid Waste Disposal Control Board is a state official. While state officials are treated as “state employees” for some purposes, state officials are not treated as “state employees” for the purpose of procuring a public contract. If a contractor has an employee or subcontractor who serves as a member of the Underground Storage Tanks and Solid Waste Disposal Control Board, the contractor may respond to a request for proposal or a request for qualifications to provide services under a contract with a state agency whose services are not overseen by the Board when the Board member does not have a duty “to vote for, let out, overlook, or in any manner superintend any work or any contract” in which the state agency is interested. The contractor may not contract with a state agency if the Board member has a duty “to vote for, let out, overlook, or in any manner superintend any work or any contract” in which the state agency is interested and the Board member is “directly interested” in the contract). The only exception is the “sole supplier” provision. If the Board member is “directly interested” in the contract but is the sole supplier of the services in a municipality or county, the Board member is treated as being only “indirectly interested” in the contract. In that instance, for the contract to be valid, the Board member must publically acknowledge his or her interest. OAG 18-20, 2018 Tenn. AG LEXIS 19 (4/23/2018).

12-4-102. Penalty for unlawful interest.

Should any person, acting as such officer, committee member, director, or other person referred to in §12-4-101, be or become directly or unlawfully indirectly interested in any such contract, such person shall forfeit all pay and compensation therefor. Such officer shall be dismissed from such office the officer then occupies, and be ineligible for the same or a similar position for ten (10) years.

Acts 1869-1870, ch. 92, §§ 2, 3; Shan., §§ 1134, 1135; Code 1932, §§ 1875, 1876; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 12-402; Acts 1983, ch. 388, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 21 Tenn. Juris., Public Officers, § 28.

Law Reviews.

Defending the Public Interest: Citizen Suits for Restitution Against Bribed Officials, 48 Tenn. L. Rev. 347.

Attorney General Opinions. Under this section, an officer who enters into a contract in violation of T.C.A. §12-4-101 must forfeit compensation under the contract; a suit to enforce this provision is a quo warranto action that ordinarily must be brought by the district attorney general, OAG 04-016, 2004 Tenn. AG LEXIS 16 (2/05/04).

12-4-103. Bidding, sale, or offer for sale by state employees prohibited.

It is hereby declared unlawful for any state official or employee to bid on, sell, or offer for sale, any merchandise, equipment or material, or similar commodity, to the state of Tennessee during the tenure of such official's or employee's office or employment, or for six (6) months thereafter, or to have any interest in the selling of the same to the state.

A person violating subsection (a) shall be liable to the state for any and all sums paid out by the state, together with interest at the rate of eight percent (8%) per annum, growing out of any such transaction.

A violation of subsection (a) is a Class E felony.

Acts 1953, ch. 160, §§ 2, 3 (Williams, §§ 1876.2, 1876.3); impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 203, § 20; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 12-404; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 24; 2013, ch. 403, § 73.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class E felony, §40-35-111.

Penalty for unlawful transactions, §12-4-104.

12-4-104. Penalty for unlawful transactions.

It is an offense for a public employee or former public employee having official responsibility for procurement transactions to accept employment with any respondent to a solicitation or contractor with whom the employee or former employee dealt in an official capacity concerning procurement transactions for a period of one (1) year from the cessation of employment by the public body unless the employee or former employee provides written notification to the public body, or a public official if designated by the public body, or both, prior to commencement of employment by that respondent to a solicitation or a contractor.

It is an offense for any person who, for compensation, prepares a solicitation for or on behalf of a public body to:

Submit a response to a solicitation for that procurement or any portion thereof; or

Disclose to any respondent to a solicitation information concerning the procurement that is not available to the public. A public body may permit such person to submit response to a solicitation for that procurement or any portion thereof if the public body determines that the exclusion of the person would limit the number of potential qualified respondents to a solicitation in a manner contrary to the best interest of the public body.

It is an offense for a contractor or subcontractor to demand or receive from any of the contractor's or subcontractor's suppliers or for a contractor to demand or receive from the contractor's subcontractors, as an inducement for the award of a subcontract or order, any payment, loan, subscription, advance, deposit of money, services or anything, present or promised, unless consideration of substantially equal or greater value is exchanged.

It is an offense for a subcontractor or supplier to make or offer to make any payment, loan, subscription, advance, deposit of money, services or anything, present or promised, unless consideration of substantially equal or greater value is exchanged.

It is an offense for any person to demand or receive any payment, loan, subscription, advance, deposit of money, services or anything of value in return for an agreement not to compete on a public contract.

If a contractor, subcontractor, supplier or any person violates any provision of this subsection (c), the amount thereof shall be conclusively presumed to have been included in the price of the contract, subcontract or order and ultimately borne by the public body and shall be recoverable from both the maker and recipient. Recovery from one (1) offending party shall not preclude recovery from other offending parties.

A contract entered into in violation of this section on or after October 1, 2011, is void. A contract that is otherwise void under this section may continue in effect until an alternative can be arranged when:

Immediate termination would result in harm to the public health or welfare; and

The continuation is approved by the commission.

Approval of continuation of contracts under this subsection (d) shall be given for the minimum period necessary to protect the public health or welfare. The chief procurement officer and the comptroller of the treasury shall be notified immediately upon a determination that a contract violates this subsection (d).

As used in this section, the term “public officer” means an individual who is elected or appointed to serve or represent a public agency, other than an employee or independent contractor of a public agency.

A public officer or employee is involved in administering a contract if the officer or employee oversees the performance of the contract or has authority to make decisions regarding the contract or to interpret the contract.

A public officer or employee is involved in making a contract if such officer or employee participates in the development of specifications or terms or in the preparation or award of the contract. A public officer is also involved in making a contract if the board, commission, or other body of which such officer is a member takes action on the contract, whether or not the public officer actually participates in that action, unless the contract is approved under an exception to this section under which the public officer is allowed to benefit and is prohibited from voting.

A public officer or employee derives a direct benefit from a contract if the person or the person's spouse:

Has more than a ten-percent ownership or other interest in an entity that is a party to the contract;

Derives any income or commission directly from the contract; or

Acquires property under the contract.

A public officer or employee is not involved in making or administering a contract solely because of the performance of ministerial duties related to the contract.

A violation of this section is a Class A misdemeanor.

Acts 1953, ch. 160, §§ 2, 3 (Williams, §§ 1876.2, 1876.3); impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 203, § 20; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 12-404; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 24; 2013, ch. 403, § 74.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which rewrote this section, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

12-4-105. Grand jury investigations.

The judges of the circuit and criminal courts of the state shall give §§12-4-103 —12-4-105 in charges to their respective grand juries, and the grand juries shall have inquisitorial powers to summon witnesses and to inquire into probable violations of those sections.

Acts 1953, ch. 160, § 4 (Williams, § 1876.4); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 12-405.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court Systems — The Jury System, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 489.

12-4-106. Prohibition against receiving rebates, gifts, money or anything of value — Conflicts of interest.

No officer or employee of the central procurement office, nor any member of the procurement commission, nor any head of any state department, institution or agency, nor any employee of any state department, institution or agency charged with the responsibility of initiating requisitions, shall accept or receive, directly or indirectly, from any person, firm or corporation to whom any contract for the purchase of goods or services for the state may be awarded, by rebate, gifts, or otherwise, any money or anything of value whatsoever, or any promise, obligation, or contract for future rewards or compensation.

It is a conflict of interest for any person or any company with whom such person is an officer, a director, or an equity owner having an ownership interest greater than one percent (1%) to bid on any public contract for goods or services for a governmental entity if such person or the immediate family member of such person is a member of a board or commission having responsibility for letting or approving such contract.

As used in this subsection (b):

“Governmental entity” means any state agency, authority, board, commission, department, or office within the executive, legislative or judicial branch of state government or any autonomous state agency, authority, board, commission, department, office, or institution of higher education; and

“Immediate family” means spouse, dependent children or stepchildren, or relatives related by blood or marriage.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 75.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former title 12, chs. 3 and 4 were recodified by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013. In the recodification, some provisions similar to former §12-3-106 were transferred to this section, and some provisions similar to this former section were transferred to §12-3-1209.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which enacted this section, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Municipal Corporations, §§ 70, 71, 76.

Attorney General Opinions. A county could not award a road design and construction contract on a “design-build” basis, without competitive bidding, to an engineering firm that had partnered with a road construction firm for that purpose, even though the county's governing body believed such an award to be in the best interest of the taxpayers, as the county was required to advertise the proposed letting of such a contract and to receive sealed bids for the proposed road project, OAG 00-086, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 88 (5/5/00).

A city board of education was not required to competitively bid a contract with a foundation, OAG 01-111, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 102 (7/11/01).

12-4-107. Contracts for professional services.

All contracts for architectural and engineering services procured by any municipal corporation, county, state, development district, utility district, human resource agency, or other political subdivision created by statute, and all contracts for construction services procured by any county, city, metropolitan government, or town for projects described in subsection (b), shall meet the following requirements:

In the procurement of architectural and engineering services, the selection committee or procurement official may seek qualifications and experience data from any firm or firms licensed in this state and interview such firm or firms. The selection committee or procurement official shall evaluate statements of qualifications and experience data regarding the procurement of architectural and engineering services, and shall conduct discussions with such firm or firms regarding the furnishing of required services and then shall select the firm deemed to be qualified to provide the services required;

The selection committee or procurement official shall negotiate a contract with the qualified firm for architectural and engineering services at compensation which the selection committee or procurement official determines to be fair and reasonable to the government. In making such determination, the selection committee or procurement official shall take into account the estimated value of the services to be rendered, the scope of work, complexity and professional nature thereof;

Should the selection committee or procurement official be unable to negotiate a satisfactory contract with the firm considered to be qualified, at a price determined to be fair and reasonable, negotiations will continue with other qualified firms until an agreement is reached;

A city, county or utility district having a satisfactory existing working relationship for architectural or engineering services may expand the scope of the services; provided, that they are within the technical competency of the existing firm, without exercising this section.

A city or county may procure surveying services by the means set forth under subdivision (a)(1).

Construction projects of a county, city, metropolitan government, town, utility district, or utility authority shall meet the following requirements:

For construction of local projects or additions to existing buildings, a county, city, metropolitan government, town, utility district, or utility authority may contract for construction management agent or advisor services or construction manager at-risk services. Construction management services may be performed by a qualified person licensed under the Contractors Licensing Act of 1994, compiled in title 62, chapter 6, part 1. Construction management services are to be procured for each project through a written request for proposals process through advertisement. The procurement and advertisement shall be in accordance with the laws, regulations, and ordinances of the county, city, metropolitan government, town, utility district, or utility authority. The written request for proposals process shall invite prospective proposers to participate and shall indicate the service requirements and the factors used for evaluating the proposals. These factors may include the construction manager's qualifications and experience on similar projects, qualifications of personnel to be assigned to the project, fees and costs, or any additional factors deemed relevant by the procuring entity for procurement of the service. The contract for such services shall be awarded to the best qualified and responsive responder. A construction manager agent or advisor is prohibited from undertaking actual construction work on a project over which the construction manager agent or advisor coordinates or oversees the planning, bid, or construction phases of the project, except in instances when bids have been solicited twice and no bids have been submitted. If the construction manager agent or advisor can document that a good faith effort was made in each bid solicitation to obtain bids and no bids were received, then the construction manager agent or advisor may perform the construction work at a price agreed upon by the construction manager agent or advisor, the architect, and the owner of the project. A governing body, at its own discretion, may perform work on the project with its own employees and may include the coordination and oversight of this work as part of the services of the construction manager agent or advisor. Sealed bids for actual construction work shall be opened at the bid opening and the names of the contractors and their bid amounts shall be announced;

Construction management agent or advisor services or construction manager at-risk services for the construction of local projects or additions to existing buildings may be performed by:

A general contractor licensed in this state pursuant to the Contractors Licensing Act of 1994; provided, that none of such services performed by a general contractor involve any of the services exempt from the requirements of title 62, chapter 6, part 1 as “normal architectural and engineering services” under § 62-6-102(4)(B), unless, with regard to the performance of any services defined as normal architectural and engineering services, the general contractor is also licensed as an architect or engineer under title 62, chapter 2; or

An architect or an engineer licensed pursuant to title 62, chapter 2; provided, that none of such services performed by an architect or engineer involve any of the services required to be performed by a contractor within the definition of “contractor” under § 62-6-102, unless with regard to the performance of any services included within the definition of “contractor”, the architect or engineer is also licensed as a contractor under the Contractors Licensing Act of 1994;

Construction work that is under the coordination and oversight of a construction manager shall be procured through competitive bids.

Acts 1969, ch. 331, § 1; T.C.A., § 12-432; Acts 1984, ch. 822, § 2; 1990, ch. 699, § 1; 1991, ch. 518, §§ 1, 2; 1998, ch. 990, § 1; 2009, ch. 518, § 1; 2013, ch. 403, § 76; T.C.A. §12-4-106; Acts 2018, ch. 794, §§ 1, 2; 2019, ch. 225, § 1; 2019, ch. 338, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former §12-4-107 (Acts 1969, ch. 331, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 8; T.C.A., § 12-433), concerning the filing of fiscal agent and/or financial advisor contracts, was repealed by Acts 2006, ch. 874, § 2, effective July 1, 2006.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which transferred §12-4-106 to this section and amended it, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment by ch. 225, substituted “county, city, metropolitan government, town, utility district, or utility authority” for “county, city, metropolitan government, or town” throughout (b).

The 2019 amendment by ch. 338, added (a)(2).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 225, § 2. April 30, 2019.

Acts 2019, ch. 338, § 2. May 10, 2019.

Attorney General Opinions. T.C.A. §12-4-107 does not permit the State, counties, cities, towns, or metropolitan governments to solicit or receive proposals or to enter into contracts for “Construction Management-at-Risk Services” for the construction of local correctional facility projects or additions to existing correctional facility buildings. Since the “Construction Management-at-Risk Services” contracts in question contemplate that the construction manager may itself perform at least some of the construction work, such contracts would not be permitted under T.C.A. §12-4-107(b) for local correctional facility construction projects. OAG 17-49, 2017 Tenn. AG LEXIS 49 (11/2/2017).